Maryland, session 2025, HB0717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
5–501.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES WHO ALSO SERVES AS A DIRECTOR OR AN
OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER § 1–1101 OF THE
NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) Except as otherwise provided in subsection [(c)] (E) of this section, an
official or employee may not participate in a matter if:
(1) the official or employee or a qualifying relative of the official or
employee has an interest in the matter and the official or employee knows of the interest;
or
(2) any of the following is a party to the matter:
(i) a business entity in which the official or employee has a direct
financial interest of which the official or employee reasonably may be expected to know;
(ii) a business entity, including a limited liability company or a
limited liability partnership, of which any of the following is an officer, a director, a trustee,
a partner, or an employee:
1. the official or employee; or
2. if known to the official or employee, a qualifying relative
of the official or employee;
(iii) a business entity with which any of the following has applied for
a position, is negotiating employment, or has arranged prospective employment:
1. the official or employee; or
2. if known to the official or employee, a qualifying relative
of the official or employee;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 443
(iv) if the contract reasonably could be expected to result in a conflict
between the private interest and the official State duties of the official or employee, a
business entity that is a party to a contract with:
1. the official or employee; or
2. if known to the official or employee, a qualifying relative
of the official or employee;
(v) a business entity, either engaged in a transaction with the State
or subject to regulation by the official’s or employee’s governmental unit, in which a direct
financial interest is owned by another business entity if the official or employee:
1. has a direct financial interest in the other business entity;
and
2. reasonably may be expected to know of both financial
interests; or
(vi) a business entity that:
1. the official or employee knows is a creditor or an obligee of
the official or employee, or of a qualifying relative of the official or employee, with respect
to a thing of economic value; and
2. as a creditor or an obligee, is in a position to affect directly
and substantially the interest of the official, employee, or qualifying relative.
[(a–1)] (C) (1) This subsection does not apply to an individual who is a public
official only as a member of a board and who receives annual compensation that is less than
25% of the lowest annual compensation at State grade level 16.
(2) A former regulated lobbyist who is or becomes subject to regulation
under this title as a public official or employee may not participate in a case, contract, or
other specific matter as a public official or employee for 1 calendar year after the
termination of the registration of the former regulated lobbyist if the former regulated
lobbyist previously assisted or represented another party for compensation in the matter.
[(b)] (D) (1) The prohibitions of subsection [(a)] (B) of this section do not
apply if participation is allowed:
(i) as to officials and employees subject to the authority of the Ethics
Commission, by regulation of the Ethics Commission;
(ii) by the opinion of an advisory body; or
– 3 –

Ch. 443 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) by another provision of this subtitle.
(2) This section does not prohibit participation by an official or employee
that is limited to the exercise of an administrative or ministerial duty that does not affect
the decision or disposition with respect to the matter.
[(c)] (E) (1) An official or employee who otherwise would be disqualified from
participation under subsection [(a)] (B) of this section shall disclose the nature and
circumstances of the conflict, and may participate or act, if:
(i) the disqualification would leave a body with less than a quorum
capable of acting;
(ii) the disqualified official or employee is required by law to act; or
(iii) the disqualified official or employee is the only individual
authorized to act.
(2) If the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Treasurer, or
Comptroller is required to make a disclosure under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Treasurer, or Comptroller, as
appropriate, shall send a copy of the disclosure to the presiding officers of the General
Assembly and to the Ethics Commission.
[(d)] (F) (1) This subsection applies only to:
(i) the Governor;
(ii) the Lieutenant Governor;
(iii) the Attorney General;
(iv) the Treasurer;
(v) the Comptroller; and
(vi) a secretary of a principal department in the Executive Branch.
(2) (i) An official who takes executive action that the official knows or
reasonably should know would have a material financial impact on the official or a person
whose interests are attributable to the official under § 5–608 of this title shall provide the
Ethics Commission and the Joint Ethics Committee a description of the executive action
and the circumstances of the potential impact.
(ii) An official is not required to make a disclosure under this
paragraph if the impact is common to all members of:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 443
1. the general public or a large class of the general public; or
2. a profession or occupation of which the official is a
member.
5–502.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) members of the General Assembly; OR
(2) AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES WHO ALSO SERVES AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED
FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER § 1–1101 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE.
5–503.
(a) This section does not apply to:
(1) members of the General Assembly; OR
(2) AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES WHO ALSO SERVES AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED
FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER § 1–1101 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE.
5–504.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES WHO ALSO SERVES AS A DIRECTOR OR AN
OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER § 1–1101 OF THE
NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
[(a)] (B) (1) This subsection does not apply to members of the General
Assembly.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, an official or
employee may not, for contingent compensation, assist or represent a party in any matter
before or involving any unit of the State or a political subdivision of the State.
(3) Paragraph (2) of this subsection does not apply to assistance to or
representation of a party:
– 5 –

Ch. 443 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) in a judicial or quasi–judicial proceeding, including a proceeding
before an administrative law judge in the Office of Administrative Hearings, or a matter
preliminary, incidental, or collateral to a judicial or quasi–judicial proceeding; or
(ii) in a matter before or involving the Workers’ Compensation
Commission, the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund, or the Criminal Injuries
Compensation Board.
[(b)] (C) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a member
of the General Assembly may not, for compensation, assist or represent a party in any
matter before or involving any unit of the State or a political subdivision of the State.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to assistance to or
representation of a party:
(i) in matters relating to the performance of ministerial acts by a
governmental unit;
(ii) in matters involving the member’s regular business,
employment, or profession, in which contact with a governmental unit:
1. is an incidental part of the business, employment, or
profession;
2. is made in the manner that is customary for persons in
that business, employment, or profession; and
3. is not for contingent compensation;
(iii) in a judicial or quasi–judicial proceeding, including a proceeding
before an administrative law judge in the Office of Administrative Hearings, or a matter
preliminary, incidental, or collateral to a judicial or quasi–judicial proceeding;
(iv) in a matter before or involving the Workers’ Compensation
Commission, the Maryland Automobile Insurance Fund, or the Criminal Injuries
Compensation Board; or
(v) in a matter in which the assistance or representation, other than
for contingent compensation, was commenced by the member of the General Assembly
before:
1. the member filed a certificate of candidacy for election to
the General Assembly at a time when the member was not an incumbent; or
2. if the member was appointed to fill a vacancy, the date of
appointment.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 443
[(c)] (D) (1) A member of the General Assembly may not assist or represent
a person, including himself or herself, for compensation before a State or local
governmental agency in any matter involving:
(i) procurement; or
(ii) the adoption of regulations.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to an administrative
proceeding conducted in accordance with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government
Article.
[(d)] (E) (1) Except for a former member of the General Assembly, who shall
be subject to the restrictions provided under paragraph (2) of this subsection, a former
official or employee may not assist or represent a party, other than the State, in a case, a
contract, or any other specific matter for compensation if:
(i) the matter involves State government; and
(ii) the former official or employee participated significantly in the
matter as an official or employee.
(2) (i) In this paragraph, “legislative action” does not include testimony
or other advocacy in an official capacity as a member of the General Assembly before a unit
of State or local government.
(ii) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph:
1. a former member of the General Assembly may not assist
or represent another party for compensation in a matter that is the subject of legislative
action for 1 calendar year from the date the member leaves office; and
2. a former Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney
General, Comptroller, State Treasurer, or secretary of a principal department of the
Executive Branch may not assist or represent another party for compensation in a matter
that is the subject of legislative action for 1 calendar year from the date the official leaves
State office.
(iii) The limitation under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph on
representation by a former member of the General Assembly, Governor, Lieutenant
Governor, Attorney General, Comptroller, State Treasurer, or secretary of a principal
department of the Executive Branch does not apply to representation of a municipal
corporation, county, or State governmental entity.
– 7 –

Ch. 443 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(e)] (F) Notwithstanding subsection [(a)(3)] (B)(3) of this section or § 5–502 of
this subtitle, a full–time official or employee in the Judicial Branch may not represent a
party before a court or unit of the Judicial Branch except in the discharge of official duties.
5–608.
(c) For the purposes of § 5–607 of this subtitle, interests held by a blind trust may
not be considered to be interests of the person making the statement if the blind trust is
approved by the Ethics Commission in accordance with regulations adopted under
[§ 5–501(b)] § 5–501(D) or § 5–502(c) of this title and is operated in compliance with those
regulations.
Article – Natural Resources
1–109.
(a) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “REAL PROPERTY INTEREST” MEANS A
NONLEASEHOLD INTEREST IN REAL PROPERTY.
(2) “REAL PROPERTY INTEREST” INCLUDES A FEE SIMPLE
ACQUISITION INTEREST, CONSERVATION EASEMENT INTEREST, OR ANOTHER
PERPETUAL EASEMENT INTEREST.
(B) (1) The Department shall negotiate the acquisition of real property
INTERESTS for open space, recreation, conservation, and other purposes under this article.
(2) [The] UNLESS OTHERWISE APPROVED BY THE BOARD OF PUBLIC
WORKS, THE Department shall make each acquisition under this subsection in the name
of the State to the use of the Department.
(3) (I) AFTER ACQUIRING A REAL PROPERTY FEE SIMPLE
INTEREST UNDER THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE A REQUEST
FOR FUNDS IN ITS ANNUAL BUDGET REQUEST TO THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET
AND MANAGEMENT TO CREATE NEW PERMANENT, CLASSIFIED POSITIONS TO
MANAGE AND ADMINISTER THE REAL PROPERTY FEE SIMPLE INTEREST.
(II) THE REQUEST FOR FUNDS SHALL BE:
1. BASED ON THE MOST RECENT DATA PROVIDED BY
THE DEPARTMENT IN THE OPEN SPACE REPORT REQUIRED BY CHAPTER 584 OF THE
ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF 1995; AND
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 443
2. CALCULATED USING THE RATIO OF AT LEAST ONE
PERMANENT, CLASSIFIED POSITION PER 400 ACRES OF NEWLY ACQUIRED REAL
PROPERTY FEE SIMPLE INTERESTS.
[(b)] (C) (1) Except for A real property INTEREST that is acquired by gift AND
SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, before [any] A real property
INTEREST is acquired from a private owner, the Department shall obtain two independent
appraisals of the property.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT, WITH THE APPROVAL OF THE BOARD OF
PUBLIC WORKS, MAY DEVELOP AND UTILIZE AN EASEMENT VALUATION SYSTEM TO
VALUE CONSERVATION EASEMENT INTERESTS.
[(c)] (D) (1) [A] EXCEPT FOR A REAL PROPERTY INTEREST THAT IS
ACQUIRED BY GIFT, A contract for the acquisition of [land] A REAL PROPERTY INTEREST
under this section shall be approved, and MAY BE executed, by the Board of Public Works.
(2) At least 40 days before the Board of Public Works may act on a [land]
REAL PROPERTY INTEREST acquisition under this section, the Department shall give
written notice of a potential acquisition of [land] A REAL PROPERTY INTEREST:
(i) To the governing body of the county in which the [land] REAL
PROPERTY INTEREST is located; and
(ii) If the [land] REAL PROPERTY INTEREST is located within a
municipal corporation, to the governing body of the municipal corporation.
(3) Within 30 days after receiving notice under this subsection, the
governing body may submit written comments to the Department.
[(d)] (E) The Board of Public Works shall supervise the expenditure of any
money that the General Assembly appropriates for the acquisition of [land] A REAL
PROPERTY INTEREST under this section.
[(e)] (F) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3), (3), AND (4) of this subsection,
the Department may dispose of [land] A REAL PROPERTY INTEREST owned and managed
by the Department as consideration for the acquisition of [land] A REAL PROPERTY
INTEREST not owned by the Department.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, in implementing
this subsection, the Department shall comply with the procedures established under Title
5, Subtitle 3 and Title 10, Subtitle 3 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
– 9 –

Ch. 443 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) (i) The Department may dispose of A real property INTEREST
owned by the State for the use and benefit of the Department in exchange for A privately
owned real property INTEREST without complying with the procedures established under
§§ 5–301 through 5–311 or §§ 10–301 through 10–309 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, if:
1. The privately owned real property INTEREST subject to
the exchange is adjacent to the real property INTEREST owned by the State for the use and
benefit of the Department;
2. The real property INTEREST owned by the State for the
use and benefit of the Department AND subject to the exchange is adjacent to the privately
owned real property INTEREST;
3. The real property INTEREST owned by the State AND
SUBJECT TO THE EXCHANGE does not exceed 5 acres in size; and
4. The owner of the privately owned real property INTEREST
requesting the exchange pays all costs associated with the exchange of the real property
INTEREST, including legal fees and boundary relocation, surveying, engineering, and
recordation costs.
(ii) Prior to a REAL property INTEREST exchange under this
paragraph, the Department shall:
1. Notify in writing by electronic mail or first–class mail:
A. Owners of property adjacent to the privately owned real
property INTEREST subject to the exchange;
B. The General Assembly members who represent the
legislative district in which the real property INTEREST exchange is located; and
C. The governing body of the county in which the real
property INTEREST exchange is located; and
2. Refer the proposed exchange to the Board of Public Works
for final disposition.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT DISPOSE OF A CONSERVATION
EASEMENT INTEREST UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
[(f)] (G) The Board of Public Works may exempt projects under this section from
the provisions of this section.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 443
[(g)] (H) (1) The Department shall adopt regulations to implement this
section.
(2) The regulations adopted under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
include a system for appraisal review developed by the Department in consultation with
the Department of General Services.
1–109.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM” MEANS THE LAND AND PROPERTY
MANAGEMENT PROGRAM.
(B) THERE IS A LAND AND PROPERTY MANAGEMENT PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROCESS REAL PROPERTY
TRANSACTIONS THAT INVOLVE PROPERTY OWNED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) THE PROGRAM IS RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(1) PROCESSING LEASE AGREEMENTS, EASEMENTS, AND OTHER
PROPERTY–RELATED DOCUMENTS; AND
(2) FACILITATING ISSUING LEASES FOR DEPARTMENT HOUSING TO
DEPARTMENT EMPLOYEES IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE DEPARTMENT’S
RESIDENTIAL HOUSING POLICY.
SUBTITLE 11. AFFILIATED FOUNDATIONS.
1–1101.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH ONE OR MORE AFFILIATED
FOUNDATIONS TO WORK WITH THE MARYLAND PARK SERVICE, THE MARYLAND
FOREST SERVICE, THE WILDLIFE AND HERITAGE SERVICE, AND THE OFFICE OF
OUTDOOR RECREATION, AND THE NATURAL RESOURCES POLICE.
(B) THE PURPOSES OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ARE TO:
(1) SOLICIT AND ACCEPT FUNDS FOR IMPROVEMENTS DESIGNED TO
EXPAND AND ENHANCE THE EQUITABLE USE OF AND ACCESS TO LANDS MANAGED
BY THE DEPARTMENT FOR RECREATION AND CONSERVATION PURPOSES;
(2) PROMOTE ACTIVITIES THAT:
– 11 –

Ch. 443 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) ENHANCE PUBLIC PROGRAMMING AND RECREATIONAL AND
EDUCATIONAL OFFERINGS;
(II) RESTORE OR MAINTAIN PUBLIC ACCESS TO THE NATURAL
RESOURCES OF THE STATE; OR
(III) SUPPORT OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE, MAINTENANCE,
AND LAW ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES WITHIN LANDS MANAGED BY THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(3) PARTNER WITH INDIVIDUALS, CORPORATIONS, AND OTHER
ENTITIES TO SUPPORT INNOVATIVE PROJECTS THAT ENHANCE VISITORS’
EXPERIENCES AT LANDS MANAGED BY THE DEPARTMENT, INCLUDING EDUCATING
VISITORS, INCREASING INCLUSIVITY, SUPPORTING SUSTAINABILITY, AND
PROMOTING HEALTH AND WELLNESS.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP POLICIES FOR OPERATING EACH AFFILIATED
FOUNDATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT ESTABLISHES, INCLUDING NAMING RIGHTS;
AND
(II) SUBMIT EACH POLICY DEVELOPED TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL AND THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION FOR REVIEW AND, IF
APPROPRIATE, APPROVAL IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL:
(I) REVIEW THE POLICIES THE DEPARTMENT DEVELOPS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR FORM AND LEGAL SUFFICIENCY;
AND
(II) IF APPROPRIATE, APPROVE THE POLICIES FOR USE IN
GOVERNING THE AFFILIATED FOUNDATION.
(3) THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) REVIEW THE POLICIES THE DEPARTMENT DEVELOPS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT PERTAIN TO CONFLICTS OF
INTEREST; AND
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 443
(II) IF APPROPRIATE, APPROVE THE POLICIES FOR USE IN
GOVERNING AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT WHO ALSO SERVES
AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF THE AFFILIATED FOUNDATION.
(D) AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION MAY SOLICIT AND RECEIVE
CONTRIBUTIONS FROM BUSINESSES, GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES, NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATIONS, AND INDIVIDUALS INTERESTED IN THE PROMOTION OF LANDS
MANAGED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(E) (1) AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED AN AGENCY OR INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE
STATE OR A UNIT OF THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH FOR ANY PURPOSE.
(2) A FINANCIAL OBLIGATION OR LIABILITY OF AN AFFILIATED
FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED A DEBT
OR AN OBLIGATION OF THE STATE OR THE DEPARTMENT.
(F) (1) SECTIONS 5–501 THROUGH 5–504 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS
ARTICLE DO NOT PROHIBIT AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT FROM
ALSO BECOMING A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION
ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) AN OFFICIAL OR EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT WHO SERVES
AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SECTION:
(I) MAY NOT BE COMPENSATED, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, BY
THE AFFILIATED FOUNDATION; AND
(II) MAY BE REIMBURSED FOR BONA FIDE EXPENSES INCURRED
IN THE PERFORMANCE OF ACTIVITIES UNDERTAKEN ON BEHALF OF THE
AFFILIATED FOUNDATION AS AUTHORIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND THE BOARD
OF DIRECTORS OF THAT AFFILIATED FOUNDATION.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOTIFY THE STATE ETHICS
COMMISSION IN WRITING WHENEVER THE DEPARTMENT ALLOWS AN OFFICIAL OR
EMPLOYEE OF THE DEPARTMENT TO SERVE AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN
AFFILIATED FOUNDATION.
(II) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE STATE ETHICS COMMISSION SHALL
NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF ANY OBJECTIONS OR CONCERNS PERTAINING TO THE
JOINT SERVICE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE.
– 13 –

Ch. 443 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) ON RECEIPT OF A NOTICE FROM THE STATE ETHICS
COMMISSION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL REEXAMINE THE JOINT SERVICE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT ANNUALLY TO THE
GOVERNOR, THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, AND THE
STATE ETHICS COMMISSION ON:
(I) THE NAMES OF THE OFFICIALS AND EMPLOYEES SERVING
AS A DIRECTOR OR AN OFFICIAL OF AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION; AND
(II) HOW THE POLICIES ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION HAVE BEEN IMPLEMENTED IN THE PRECEDING YEAR.
(G) EACH YEAR AN INDEPENDENT CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANT SHALL
AUDIT AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(H) FUNDS ACCEPTED BY AN AFFILIATED FOUNDATION UNDER THIS
SECTION ARE SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND ARE NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF
FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE PROVIDED IN THE ANNUAL STATE
OPERATING OR CAPITAL BUDGET BILL FOR PROJECTS OR ACTIVITIES OF THE
DEPARTMENT.
5–212.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Forest or Park Reserve Fund.
(b) There is a Forest or Park Reserve Fund in the Department.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Except as provided in § 5–307(f)(1)(iv) of this title, any money obtained
from the State forest reserves, State parks, scenic reserves, parkways, historic monuments,
and recreation areas;
(2) Revenue distributed to the Fund from fines collected under § 5–1302 of
this title; [and]
(3) Revenue received by the Fund under § 5–207(b) of this subtitle; AND
(4) ANY MONEY TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND UNDER § 5–903(I)(3)(II)
OF THIS TITLE.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 443
5–903.
(e) (3) An agreement under this subsection shall be subject to approval by the
Board of Public Works under [§ 1–109(c)] § 1–109(D) of this article.
(I) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SECTION OR
THE ALLOCATION FORMULAS IN § 13–209 OF THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE AND
SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE GOVERNOR MAY TRANSFER
TO THE DEPARTMENT FUNDS FROM THE PROGRAM OPEN SPACE STATE LAND
ACQUISITION BALANCE IF:
(I) THE BALANCE IS MORE THAN $80,000,000 AT THE END OF A
GIVEN FISCAL YEAR; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT’S EXISTING SPECIAL FUND SOURCES
ARE INSUFFICIENT TO COVER EXISTING SALARIES FOR PERMANENT, CLASSIFIED
POSITIONS RESPONSIBLE FOR OPERATING AND MAINTAINING LANDS
ADMINISTERED AND MANAGED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) AFTER A FUND TRANSFER UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE REMAINING BALANCE MUST BE AT LEAST $80,000,000.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY USE ANY AMOUNT OF THE
TRANSFERRED FUNDS AS A ONE–TIME FISCAL YEAR EXPENDITURE FOR:
1. OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE OF LANDS
ADMINISTERED AND MANAGED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
2. ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES RELATED TO LAND
ACQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER PROGRAM OPEN SPACE; OR
3. LAW ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITIES, SERVICES,
SALARIES, AND RELATED EXPENSES OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES POLICE.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY TRANSFER ANY AMOUNT OF THE
TRANSFERRED FUNDS TO THE FOREST OR PARK RESERVE FUND ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 5–212 OF THIS TITLE.
(4) ANY FUND TRANSFER MADE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SUPPLEMENTS RATHER THAN SUPPLANTS ANY OTHER FUNDING FOR OPERATION,
MAINTENANCE, AND ADMINISTRATION OF LANDS ADMINISTERED AND MANAGED BY
THE DEPARTMENT REGARDLESS OF THE SOURCE OF THE OTHER FUNDING.
5–905.
– 15 –

Ch. 443 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (3) Subject to the approval of the Department, a local governing body may
use part of its acquisition funds for initial or periodic updating of local land preservation
and recreation plans. The amount that may be used by a subdivision for planning purposes
in the local land preservation and recreation plan shall not exceed [$25,000 for any one
fiscal year] $125,000 FOR ANY INDIVIDUAL PLAN UPDATE WITHIN THE 5–YEAR
UPDATE CYCLE. Local matching funds are not required for planning or updating the local
land preservation and recreation plan.
(c) (1) (i) One half of any local governing body’s annual apportionment
shall be used for acquisition or development projects provided that up to [20 percent] 20%
of the funds authorized for acquisition or development projects under this subparagraph
may be used for capital renewal as defined in § 5–901 of this subtitle.
(ii) 1. THIS SUBPARAGRAPH APPLIES TO A LOCAL
GOVERNING BODY’S:
A. APPORTIONMENT NOT YET ENCUMBERED AS OF JULY
1, 2025;
B. FISCAL YEAR 2026 APPORTIONMENT; AND
C. FUTURE ANNUAL APPORTIONMENT.
2. [1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, if] IF the Department and the Department of Planning certify that
acquisition goals set forth in the current, approved local land preservation and recreation
plan have been met [and that such acreage attainment equals or exceeds the minimum
recommended acreage goals developed for that jurisdiction under the Maryland Land
Preservation and Recreation Plan], a local governing body may use up to [75 percent] 100%
of its future annual apportionment for development projects [for a period of 5 years after
attainment], provided that up to [20 percent] 20% of the funds authorized for use for
development projects under this subparagraph may be used for capital renewal
APPORTIONMENT FOR DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS.
[2. If the Department and the Department of Planning certify
that acquisition goals set forth in the current, approved local land preservation and
recreation plan have been exceeded and that the acreage attainment exceeds the minimum
recommended acreage goals developed for that jurisdiction under the Maryland Land
Preservation and Recreation Plan, the local governing body of a jurisdiction that has more
than 65,000 acres of land within the jurisdiction consisting of State forests, State parks, or
wildlife management areas may use up to 100 percent of its future annual apportionment
for development projects and capital renewal.]
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 443
(iii) If a county determines that it qualifies for the additional funds
for development and capital renewal projects under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
before the due date for all local governing bodies to submit revised local land preservation
and recreation plans, that county may submit an interim local land preservation and
recreation plan:
1. Prior to the submission under subsection (b)(2) of this
section; and
2. In addition to the submission required under subsection
(b)(2) of this section.
(3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, if the
local governing body is unable to obtain STATE OR federal funds OTHER THAN THE
FUNDS ALLOCATED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION AND pursuant to §
5–906 of this subtitle, for each approved local development project the State shall provide:
1. 75 percent of the total project cost; or
2. If the Department has certified pursuant to paragraph (1)
of this subsection that acquisition goals have been met, 90 percent of the total project cost.
(ii) Except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, if
STATE FUNDS, OTHER THAN THE FUNDS ALLOCATED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION, OR federal funds are provided on any development project cost, [the State
shall provide 50 percent of the difference between the total project cost and the federal
contribution. Subject to the limitation that total State funds, when added to every other
available fund, may not exceed 100 percent of a project’s cost, the minimum State
contribution to a project shall be 25 percent. If the federal funds are less than 50 percent of
the total project cost, the State shall provide an amount equal to the difference between the
federal contribution and] AND PROVIDED THAT THE TOTAL STATE FUNDS WHEN
ADDED TO EVERY OTHER AVAILABLE FUND DOES NOT EXCEED 100 PERCENT OF THE
TOTAL PROJECT COST, THE LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL MATCH:
1. [75 percent of the total project cost] 25 PERCENT OF THE
PROGRAM OPEN SPACE GRANT AMOUNT; or
2. [If the Department has certified pursuant to paragraph (1)
of this subsection that acquisition goals have been met, 90 percent of the total project cost]
10 PERCENT OF THE PROGRAM OPEN SPACE GRANT AMOUNT.
(d) If land is donated to local governing bodies during the fiscal year, 75 percent
of the appraised value the Department approves may be applied as a portion of, or all of,
the local governing body’s share of the project’s cost for the projects referred to in [§ 5–904
of this subtitle] SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
– 17 –

Ch. 443 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) If federal funds are received for any approved local project after it was funded
by the State in accordance with [subsection (b)] SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) of this section
[or § 5–904 of this subtitle], the applicant shall reimburse the State in an amount equal to
the federal contribution. The reimbursement shall be reserved for other projects approved
for the applicant up to the limit of the share allocated to the local governing body.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 18 –